Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 5. Alaska Criminal Justice Commission.

Effective dates. —

Section 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014 makes this article effective July 1, 2014.

Sec. 44.19.641.
Creation of commission.

The Alaska Criminal Justice Commission is established in the Office of the Governor.

History.

(§ 32 ch 83 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For expiration of commission see AS

44.66.010(a)

.

Sec. 44.19.642.
Membership; staff.

The commission consists of 14 members as follows:

the chief justice of the Alaska Supreme Court or another active or retired justice of the supreme court or an active or retired judge of the court of appeals designated by the chief justice;

an active or retired superior court judge designated by the chief justice for a three-year term;

an active or retired district court judge designated by the chief justice for a three-year term;

a member of the Alaska Native community designated by the Alaska Native Justice Center for a three-year term;

the attorney general or a designee of the attorney general;

the public defender or a designee of the public defender;

the commissioner of corrections or the commissioner’s designee;

the commissioner of public safety or the commissioner’s designee;

the chief executive officer of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority or the chief executive officer’s designee for a three-year term;

an active duty member of a municipal law enforcement agency appointed by the governor for a three-year term;

one victims’ rights advocate appointed by the governor for a three-year term;

one nonvoting member, serving ex officio, who is a member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate;

one nonvoting member, serving ex officio, who is a member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

one nonvoting member, serving ex officio, who is the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee.

A member appointed under (a)(10) or (11) of this section serves at the pleasure of the governor and may be reappointed.

The commission shall, by majority vote of the membership, elect a chair and other officers it considers necessary from among its membership to serve on a yearly basis.

The Alaska Judicial Council shall provide staff and administrative support to the commission.

History.

(§ 32 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 66 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “14 members” for “13 members”, added (a)(14), and made related changes.

Sec. 44.19.643.
Compensation.

Members of the commission serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 32 ch 83 SLA 2014)

Sec. 44.19.644.
Meetings.

A majority of the members constitutes a quorum for conducting business and exercising the powers of the commission. The commission shall meet at least quarterly, at the call of the chair, at the request of the majority of the members, or at a regularly scheduled time as determined by a majority of the members. The commission shall keep a record of its proceedings and make these records available for public inspection.

History.

(§ 32 ch 83 SLA 2014)

Sec. 44.19.645.
Powers and duties of the commission.

The commission shall evaluate the effect of sentencing laws and criminal justice practices on the criminal justice system to evaluate whether those sentencing laws and criminal justice practices provide for protection of the public, community condemnation of the offender, the rights of victims of crimes, the rights of the accused and the person convicted, restitution from the offender, and the principle of reformation. The commission shall make recommendations for improving criminal sentencing practices and criminal justice practices, including rehabilitation and restitution. The commission shall annually make recommendations to the governor and the legislature on how savings from criminal justice reforms should be reinvested to reduce recidivism. In formulating its recommendations, the commission shall consider

statutes, court rules, and court decisions relevant to sentencing of criminal defendants in misdemeanor and felony cases;

sentencing practices of the judiciary, including use of presumptive sentences;

means of promoting uniformity, proportionality, and accountability in sentencing;

alternatives to traditional forms of incarceration;

the efficacy of parole and probation in ensuring public safety, achieving rehabilitation, and reducing recidivism;

the adequacy, availability, and effectiveness of treatment and rehabilitation programs;

crime and incarceration rates, including the rate of violent crime and the abuse of controlled substances, in this state compared to other states, and best practices adopted by other states that have proven to be successful in reducing recidivism;

the relationship between sentencing priorities and correctional resources;

the effectiveness of the state’s current methodologies for the collection and dissemination of criminal justice data; and

whether the schedules for controlled substances in AS

11.71.140

-

11.71.190

are reasonable and appropriate, considering the criteria established in AS

11.71.120(c)

.

The commission may

recommend legislative and administrative action on criminal justice practices;

select and retain the services of consultants as necessary;

appoint a working group to review and analyze the implementation of the recommendations made in the justice reinvestment report in December 2015, and other recommendations issued by the commission, and regularly report to the commission on the status of the implementation; a working group may include representatives of criminal justice agencies and key constituencies who are not members of the commission; and

enter into data-sharing agreements with the Justice Center at the University of Alaska, the Alaska Judicial Council, or other research institutions for the purposes of analyzing data and performance metrics.

The commission shall

receive and analyze data collected by agencies and entities charged with implementing the recommendations of the 2015 justice reinvestment report and other recommendations issued by the commission and who are collecting data during the implementation and management of specific commission recommendations;

track and assess outcomes from the recommendations the commission has made and corresponding criminal justice reforms;

request, receive, and review data and reports on performance outcome data relating to criminal justice reform;

appoint a working group to review and analyze sexual offense statutes and report to the legislature if there are circumstances under which victims’ rights, public safety, and the rehabilitation of offenders are better served by changing existing laws; the working group shall consult with the office of victims’ rights in developing the report; the commission shall deliver the report to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available; the commission may include in the working group people representing a variety of viewpoints who are not members of the commission; and

explore the possibility of entering into mutually agreeable arrangements with regional nonprofit organizations, including tribes and tribal organizations, to provide the pretrial, probation, and parole services needed in underserved areas of the state.

Agencies and entities reporting data to the working group authorized in (b)(3) of this section under (e) — (g) of this section shall

report data individually by case number, including an identifier number such as the Alaska Public Safety Information Network number, the court case number, the Alaska Corrections Offender Management System number, and the arrest tracking number, as available;

include demographic information necessary for tracking individuals across multiple databases, including the individual’s first name, last name, middle initial as available, and date of birth; and

include information necessary to measure possible disparate effects of criminal justice laws and policies, such as race and gender as available.

The judiciary shall report quarterly to the working group authorized in (b)(3) of this section. The report shall include criminal case processing data, including

the date, type, and number of all charges disposed within the quarter;

the disposition of each charge, whether convicted, dismissed, acquitted, or otherwise disposed; and

the date of the disposition for each charge.

The Department of Public Safety shall report quarterly to the working group authorized under (b)(3) of this section. The report shall include the following information:

data on citations and arrests for criminal offenses, including the offense charged and reason for arrest if an arrest was made;

data on all criminal convictions and sentences during the quarter; and

criminal history information for selected offenders as agreed on by the department and the working group authorized in (b)(3) of this section.

The Department of Corrections shall report quarterly to the working group authorized in (b)(3) of this section. The report shall include the following information:

data on pretrial decision making and outcomes, including information on pretrial detainees admitted for a new criminal charge; detainees released at any point before case resolution; time spent detained before first release or case resolution; pretrial defendant risk level and charge; pretrial release recommendations made by pretrial services officers; pretrial conditions imposed on pretrial detainees by judicial officers, including amount of bail, and supervision conditions; and information on pretrial outcomes, including whether or not the defendant appeared in court or was re-arrested during the pretrial period;

data on offenders admitted to the Department of Corrections for a new criminal conviction, including the offense type, number of prior felony convictions, sentence length, and length of stay;

data on the population of the Department of Corrections, using a one-day snapshot on the first day of the first month of each quarter, broken down by type of admission, offense type, and risk level;

data on offenders on probation supervised by the Department of Corrections, including the total number of offenders supervised using a one-day snapshot on the first month of each quarter; admissions to probation; assignments to a program under AS

33.05.020(f)

; probation sentence length; time served on the sentence; whether probation was successfully completed, any new convictions for a felony offense, and any sentences to a term of imprisonment while on probation;

data on parole, including the number of offenders supervised on parole, using a one-day snapshot on the first month of each quarter; the number of parole hearings; the parole grant rate and number of parolees released on discretionary and special medical parole; and information on parolees, including time spent on parole, whether parole was successfully completed, any new convictions for a new felony offense, and any sentences to a term of imprisonment while on parole;

data on the implementation of policies from the 2015 justice reinvestment report, including the number and percentage of offenders who earn compliance credits under AS

33.05.020(h)

or AS

33.16.270

in one or more months, and the total amount of credits earned; the average number of sanctions issued under AS

33.05.020(g)

before a petition to revoke probation or parole is filed; and the most common violations of probation or parole; and

data on probation and parole revocations, including information on probationers and parolees admitted for a supervision violation pre-case and post-case resolution; probationers and parolees admitted for a new arrest; the number of previous revocations on the current sentence, if any; the length of time held pre-case resolution; the length of time to case resolution; and the length of stay.

[Repealed, § 73, ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017.]

History.

(§ 32 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 163am § 164 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 25 ch 13 SLA 2017; am §§ 67, 68 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§ 73, 83 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 122 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent “that the Alaska Criminal Justice Commission work with the Department of Public Safety and local law enforcement agencies to offer statewide informational sessions on ch. 36, SLA 2016, ch. 13, SLA 2017, and” ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, see sec. 1, ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a), inserted “The commission shall annually make recommendations to the governor and the legislature on how savings from criminal justice reforms should be reinvested to reduce recidivism.” following “rehabilitation and restitution.”; added (b)(3) and (4); added (c), (d), (e), (f) and (g).

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (g)(5), deleted “administrative,” following “parolees released on” and made a related change; added (h). The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (h).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “probationers and parolees admitted solely for a technical violation;” following “post-case resolution;” in (g)(7).

Sec. 44.19.646.
Methodology.

In making recommendations, the commission shall

solicit and consider information and views from a variety of constituencies to represent the broad spectrum of views that exist with respect to possible approaches to sentencing and administration of justice in the state; and

base recommendations on the following factors:

the seriousness of each offense in relation to other offenses;

the effect of an offender’s prior criminal history on sentencing;

the need to rehabilitate criminal offenders;

the need to confine offenders to prevent harm to the public;

the extent to which criminal offenses harm victims and endanger the public safety and order;

the effect of sentencing in deterring an offender or other members of society from future criminal conduct;

the effect of sentencing as a community condemnation of criminal acts and as a reaffirmation of societal norms;

the elimination of unjustified disparity in sentences;

the sufficiency of state agency resources to administer the criminal justice system of the state;

the effect of criminal justice laws and practices on reducing the rate of recidivism in the state;

peer reviewed and data-driven research; and

the efficacy of evidence-based restorative justice initiatives on persons convicted of criminal violations and offenses, the victim, and the community.

History.

(§ 32 ch 83 SLA 2014)

Sec. 44.19.647.
Annual report and recommendations. [Conditionally effective.]

The commission shall submit to the governor and the legislature an annual report. The report must include

a description of its proceedings for the previous calendar year;

a summary of savings and recommendations on how savings from criminal justice reform should be reinvested to reduce recidivism;

performance metrics and outcomes from the recommendations the commission made in its December 2015 report, including recidivism rates, defined as

the percentage of inmates who return to prison within three years after release, broken down by offense type and risk level; and

the percentage of inmates who return to prison within three years after release for a new criminal conviction, broken down by offense type and risk level;

recommendations for additional reforms, which may include recommendations for legislative and administrative action; and

data reported by the Department of Law under AS

44.23.040

.

The commission shall submit the reports, summaries, and recommendations provided under this section not later than November 1 of each year.

[Repealed, § 73 ch 1 4SSLA 2017.]

History.

(§ 32 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 165am § 166 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§ 69, 70 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§ 73, 83 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 123 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision requiring a special report by the commission to the governor regarding alcohol-related offenses in AS 28, to be submitted no later than July 1, 2017, see sec. 37, ch. 83, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, inserted “.The report must include (1) a description” preceding “of its proceedings”; added (2), (3) and (4); deleted “and may submit” at the end of (4); deleted “reports and recommendations provided under this section shall be submitted not later than February 1 of each year” following “administrative action.”; added (b); and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (b), inserted “, summaries,” following “submit the reports”, and deleted “(a) of” following “provided under”; and added (c). The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (c).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(5), and made related stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

Section 38, ch. 83, SLA 2014 provides that “the commission shall submit its first report to the governor and the legislature not later than February 1, 2016.”

Sec. 44.19.649.
Definition.

In AS

44.19.641

—

44.19.649

, “commission” means the Alaska Criminal Justice Commission.

History.

(§ 32 ch 83 SLA 2014)

Secs. 44.19.650 — 44.19.680.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.076 — 44.19.082.]

Secs. 44.19.700 — 44.19.714.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.084 — 44.19.100.]

Secs. 44.19.720 — 44.19.728.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.101 — 44.19.105.]

Secs. 44.19.738 — 44.19.744.
Governor’s Planning Council on the Administration of Criminal Justice. [Repealed, § 2 ch 88 SLA 1971. For current law, see AS 44.19.110 — 44.19.122.]

Secs. 44.19.746 — 44.19.758.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.110 — 44.19.122.]

Secs. 44.19.760 — 44.19.775.
State-Federal Natural Resources Land Use Planning Commission. [Repealed, § 2 ch 181 SLA 1972.]

Secs. 44.19.777 — 44.19.787.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.123 — 44.19.130.]

Secs. 44.19.789 — 44.19.799.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.131 — 44.19.140.]

Secs. 44.19.800 — 44.19.850.
Alaska Safety Council.
[Repealed, § 20 ch 241 SLA 1976.]

Secs. 44.19.870 — 44.19.881.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.141 — 44.19.152.]

Sec. 44.19.890.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 219 SLA 1970.]

Secs. 44.19.891 — 44.19.894.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.155 — 44.19.162.]

Secs. 44.19.900 — 44.19.950.
Alaska State Council on the Arts. [Repealed, E.O. No. 44, § 3 (1980).
For current provisions, see AS 44.27.040 — 44.27.060.]

Sec. 44.19.955.
Commission on the Status of Women. [Repealed, § 11 ch 42 SLA 1972.]

Secs. 44.19.956 — 44.19.959.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.165 — 44.19.168.]

Sec. 44.19.960.
[Repealed, § 11 ch 42 SLA 1972.]

Secs. 44.19.961 — 44.19.964.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.169 — 44.19.175.]

Sec. 44.19.965.
[Repealed, § 11 ch 42 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 44.19.966.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.180.]

Secs. 44.19.970 — 44.19.999.
[Repealed, § 11 ch 42 SLA 1972.]